Nebraska, session 109, LB523.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB523 LB523
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 7 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Student Teacher Compensation Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds and declares:
(1) Student teaching is a critical component of teacher preparation
and requires significant time and effort;
(2) Many student teachers face financial hardships due to the unpaid
nature of the teaching practicum, which limits the ability for student
teachers to work additional jobs;
(3) Nebraska faces a teacher shortage, particularly in high-need
subject areas and rural parts of the state; and
(4) Providing financial compensation to student teachers will
support the academic and professional success of such students while
encouraging more individuals to enter and complete a teacher education
program.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Student Teacher Compensation Act:
(1) Accredited teacher education program means a program at a
college or university accredited by an accrediting agency recognized by
the United States Department of Education and determined to be acceptable
by the State Board of Education that prepares individuals for teacher
certification;
(2) Participating school means any public, private, denominational,
or parochial school in Nebraska hosting a student teacher; and
(3) Student teacher means an individual enrolled in an accredited
teacher education program who is completing a supervised teaching
practicum in a participating school as part of the requirements for
teacher certification.
Sec. 4. (1) The State Department of Education shall develop a
stipend program to provide financial compensation to student teachers as
provided in this section. The department shall provide a stipend of four
thousand dollars per student-teaching semester to any student teacher
that applies for such stipend and is eligible pursuant to subsection (3)
-2-

LB523 LB523
2025 2025
of this section.
(2) A student teacher may apply to the department in a manner
prescribed by the Commissioner of Education for a stipend under the
Student Teacher Compensation Act. Such application shall include:
(a) The name of the student-teacher;
(b) The name of the accredited teacher education program in which
the student teacher is enrolled;
(c) The participating school in which the student teacher is
completing a supervised teaching practicum;
(d) A demonstration of financial hardship in a manner determined by
the department; and
(e) Any other information the department may require.
(3) A student teacher shall be eligible for a stipend if the student
teacher:
(a) Is enrolled in an accredited teacher education program in
Nebraska;
(b) Is in the process of completing or signed a contract to complete
a supervised teaching practicum at a participating school; and
(c) Demonstrates a financial need in a manner determined by the
department.
Sec. 5. (1) The State Department of Education shall electronically
submit an annual report to the Clerk of the Legislature and the Governor
detailing the implementation of the Student Teacher Compensation Act. The
report shall be available to the public and posted on the department's
website.
(2)(a) The report shall include:
(i) The number of student teachers receiving a stipend;
(ii) The distribution by geographic area and subject matter area of
student teachers receiving a stipend; and
(iii) Feedback from participants and schools regarding the
effectiveness of the Student Teacher Compensation Act.
-3-

LB523 LB523
2025 2025
(b) The report shall not identify any individual person or school
providing feedback.
Sec. 6. It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds
annually to the State Department of Education to provide stipends to
student teachers pursuant to the Student Teacher Compensation Act. The
department may also seek additional funding through grants, private
donations, or federal programs.
Sec. 7. The State Board of Education may adopt and promulgate rules
and regulations to carry out the Student Teacher Compensation Act.
Sec. 8. This act becomes operative on July 1, 2025.
Sec. 9. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-4-